Hawaii statutes.
§624-25 Discovery. A civil action in
the nature of a bill for discovery may be brought according to the usages and
principles of courts of equity, unless the matter is governed by the rules of
court. [L 1972, c 143, §1(c)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next